test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_VINIT_iitaawis_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niiitaawisishinaanibanag
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niiitaawisishiniibaning
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niiitaawisishiniibanan
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niiitaawisishiniibanag
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niiitaawisishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niiitaawisishiwaaibaning
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niiitaawisishiwaaibanan
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niiitaawisishiwaaibanag
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisishinaanibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisishinaanibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisishinaanibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisishiniibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisishiniibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisishiniibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisishiwaaibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisishiwaaibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisishiwaaibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisishinaanibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisishinaanibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisishinaanibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisishiniibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisishiniibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisishiniibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisishiwaaibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisishiwaaibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisishiwaaibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisishiniibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisishiniibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisishiniibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisenhimishinaaniban
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisenhimishiniiban
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisenhimishiwaaiban
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iitaawisensimishinaaniban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iitaawisensimishiniiban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iitaawisensimishiwaaiban
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisenhimishinaaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisenhimishinaanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisenhimishinaanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisenhimishiniing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisenhimishinian
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisenhimishiniag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisenhimishiwaaing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisenhimishiwaaan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisenhimishiwaaag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iitaawisensimishinaaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iitaawisensimishinaanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iitaawisensimishinaanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iitaawisensimishiniing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iitaawisensimishinian
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iitaawisensimishiniag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iitaawisensimishiwaaing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iitaawisensimishiwaaan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iitaawisensimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhimishibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhimishibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhimishibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhimish***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensimishibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensimishibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensimishibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensimish***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensimish***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhiminaanibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhiminaanibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhiminaanibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhiminiibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhiminiibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhiminiibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhimini***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhimiwaaibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhimiwaaibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhimiwaaibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensiminaanibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensiminaanibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensiminaanibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensiminiibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensiminiibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensiminiibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensimini***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensimini***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensimini***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensimiwaaibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensimiwaaibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensimiwaaibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhishinaanibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhishinaanibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhishinaanibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhishiniibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhishiniibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhishiniibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhishini***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisenhishiwaaibaning
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisenhishiwaaibanan
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisenhishiwaaibanag
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iitaawis+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iitaawisenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iitaawisensishinaanibaning
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iitaawisensishinaanibanan
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iitaawisensishinaanibanag
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iitaawisensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iitaawis+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iitaawisensishinaan***idig, idog***an
